Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.190

Deferred finding program—Failure to register vehicle, aircraft, or vessel.

Any county may set up a deferred finding program for persons who receive a citation for failing to register a vehicle under RCW 46.16A.030, an aircraft under RCW 47.68.255, or a vessel under RCW 88.02.400. Upon receipt of proof satisfactory to the prosecuting attorney's office with jurisdiction over the offense, which shall include payment of a five hundred dollar fine, that the person cited has a valid Washington state driver's license, and that the person cited has registered the vehicle, aircraft, or vessel that was the subject of the citation in Washington state, the citation must be dismissed. If receipt of proof does not occur within ninety days of the citation, the prosecuting attorney must seek the full penalty available for the citation. Fines generated pursuant to this program shall be used by the county for the purpose of enforcement and prosecution of registration requirements under RCW 46.16A.030, 47.68.255, or 88.02.400. This section applies to persons who have never received a previous citation or participated in a program of deferred finding for failing to register a vehicle under RCW 46.16A.030, an aircraft under RCW 47.68.255, or a vessel under RCW 88.02.400.

[ 2019 c 423 s 202.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2019 c 423: See notes following RCW 82.08.0273.